Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 2. Mississippi Commercial Driver’s License Law.

§§ 63-1-74 through 63-1-90.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 27, effective July 1, 2009.

§63-1-74. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-75. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 8; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-1-76. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-77. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-78. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 304 § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-1-79. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 7; Laws, 1992, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 322, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§63-1-80. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-81. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 20; Laws, 2002, ch. 388, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-1-82. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 10; Laws, 1992, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 535, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 322, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-1-83. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 11; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 14; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-1-84. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-85. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-86. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 14, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-87. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 15, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-88. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 16, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-89. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 17, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]

§63-1-90. [Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 18, eff from and after January 1, 1990.]